Montana, session 2025, HB749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Priority criteria for public assistance and human services
contractors. The applicable department shall award contracts for the provision of human services, family
services, and public assistance programs, including housing assistance and energy assistance programs, using
a scoring system that gives priority to the following criteria:
(1) demonstrated experience of the eligible provider in successfully operating the program within
the specified geographic area;
(2) the length of time the provider has been providing relevant service in the state;
(3) the provider's ability to leverage its existing relationships and partnerships to facilitate the
effective implementation of the program; and
(4) the number of in-state jobs the provider proposes to create or maintain relative to the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 749

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 749.1
population of the region where service is proposed.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 18, chapter 4, part 3, and the provisions of Title 18, chapter 4, part 3, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 749